src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VAKSA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
                 +V+Inf:vaksa    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:vaksi    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:veksur   #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:veksur   #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:vaksa    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:vaks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:vaks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:vaks     #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vuksu    #  ;
              +V+Imp+Sg:vaks     #  ;
              +V+Imp+Pl:vaksið   #  ;
              +V+PrsPrc:vaksandi VANDI ;
              +V+PrfPrc:vaksin   #  ;
                 +V+Sup:vaksið   #  ;

LEXICON VEKSA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
                 +V+Inf:eksa    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eksi    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eksur   #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:eksur   #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eksa    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:aks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:aks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:aks     #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:uksu    #  ;
              +V+Imp+Sg:eks     #  ;
              +V+Imp+Pl:eksið   #  ;
              +V+PrsPrc:eksandi VANDI ;
              +V+PrfPrc:aksin   #  ;
                 +V+Sup:aksið   #  ;


LEXICON s30/26_1
!! __@LEXNAME@__ dáma
		s30		;
		s26_1	;
      	p7      ;

LEXICON HYGGJA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:hyggja   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:hyggi   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:hyggur   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:hyggur   	#       ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:hyggja   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:hugdi   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:hugdi   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:hugdi   	#       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:hugdu   	#       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:hygg   		#       ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:hyggið   	#       ;
      +V+PrsPrc:hyggjandi   VANDI   ;
      +V+PrfPrc:hugdur   	#       ;
         +V+Sup:hugt   		#       ;



!LEXICON
!         +Inf:   #       ;
! +Ind+Prs+1Sg:   #       ;
! +Ind+Prs+2Sg:   #       ;
! +Ind+Prs+3Sg:   #       ;
!  +Ind+Prs+Pl:   #       ;
!  +Ind+Prt+1Sg:   #       ;
!  +Ind+Prt+2Sg:   #       ;
!  +Ind+Prt+3Sg:   #       ;
!  +Ind+Prt+Pl:   #       ;
!      +Imp+Sg:   #       ;
!      +Imp+Pl:   #       ;
!      +PrsPrc:   #       ;
!      +PrfPrc:   #       ;
!         +Sup:   #       ;

!         +V+Inf+Pass:   #       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg+Pass:   #       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg+Pass:   #       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+Imp+Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+Imp+Pl+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+PrsPrc+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+PrfPrc+Pass:   #       ;
!         +V+Sup+Pass:   #       ;



LEXICON LOYPAST !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ loypast
			reflinf		;
			pres_ist	;
			pres_plast	;
			pret_tist	;
			pret_pltust	;

LEXICON sxrefl !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ This is an ad hoc lexicon
  s74 ;

LEXICON s74 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ grindast
  			reflinf  	;
  			pres_ist 	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_adist  ;
  :%>að		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s75 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ balast
  			reflinf   	;
  			pres_ist  	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_dist 	;
  :%>d		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s76 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ ræðast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist  	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_dist 	;
  :%>d		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s77 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ skiftast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist  	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_ist	;
 			pret_plust	;

LEXICON s78 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ farast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_1ist	;
  :%^IUML	pres_23st	;
  			pres_plast	;
  :%^AB3	pret_st		;
  :%^AB3	pret_plust	;

LEXICON s79 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ skjótast
  :%>jót	reflinf 	;
  :%>jót	pres_1ist	;
  :%>jýt	pres_23st	;
  :%>jót	pres_plast	;
  :%>eyt	pret_st		;
  :%>ut		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s80 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ trivast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
  			pres_23st	;
    		pres_plast	;
  :%^AB1	pret_st		;
  :%^VSH	pret_plust	;

LEXICON s81 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ kíkjast
  :%>j		reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
  :%>j 		pres_plast	;
  			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;

LEXICON s82 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ fýlast
			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;

LEXICON s83 !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ samsinnast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
		  	pres_plast	;
			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;

LEXICON FYRIB !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ kopi, s83
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
		  	pres_plast	;
			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;



!! !!Split lexica
! ============

! The lexicon names are, as always, from FO.
! Now, these are just mechanically split.
! They should be split more precisely,
! just like s2/1, in order to keep
! things minimal.

!LEXICON s1/26
!            s1    ;
!            s26   ;

!LEXICON s1/30
!            s1    ;
!            s30   ;

!LEXICON s11/15
!            s11   ;
!            s15   ;

!LEXICON s15/11
!            s15   ;
!            s11   ;

!LEXICON s18/16
!            s18   ;
!            s16   ;

!LEXICON s19/30
!            s19   ;
!            s30   ;

!LEXICON s2/1
!            s2    ;
!            prt_d ; ! this is the s1 part

!LEXICON s2/30
!            s2    ;
!            s30   ;

!LEXICON s21/11
!            s21   ;
!            s11   ;
!
!LEXICON s21/18
!            s21   ;
!            s18   ;
!
!LEXICON s24/2
!            s24   ;
!            s2    ;
!
!LEXICON s25/1
!            s25   ;
!            s1    ;
!
!LEXICON s27/30
!            s27   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s28/30
!            s28   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s29/2
!            s29   ;
!            s2    ;
!
!LEXICON s29/30
!            s29   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s3/30
!            s3    ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/1
!            s30   ;
!            s1    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/11
!            s30   ;
!            s11   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/19
!            s30   ;
!            s19   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/2
!            s30   ;
!            s2    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/22
!            s30   ;
!            s22   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/27
!            s30   ;
!            s27   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/28
!            s30   ;
! +Err/Orth: s28   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/29
!            s30   ;
!   +Use/NG: s29   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/40
!            s30   ;
!            s40   ;
!
!LEXICON s30/5
!            s30   ;
!            s5    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/6
!            s30   ;
!            s6    ;
!
!LEXICON s30/9
!            s30   ;
!            s9    ;
!
!LEXICON s36/2
!            s36   ;
!            s2    ;

!LEXICON s39/30
             !s30  ;
             !s39  ;

!LEXICON s47/19
!            s47   ;
!            s19   ;
!
!LEXICON s49/52
!            s49   ;
!            s52   ;
!
!LEXICON s49/9
!            s49   ;
!            s9    ;
!
!LEXICON s5/30
!            s5    ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s52/30
!            s52   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s6/30
!            s6    ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s60/30
!            s60   ;
!            s30   ;
!
!LEXICON s7/49
!            s7    ;
!            s49   ;
!
!LEXICON s74/75
!            s74   ;
!            s75   ;
!
!LEXICON s77/74
!            s77   ;
!            s74   ;
!
!LEXICON s8/30
!            s8    ;
!            s30   ;
!
LEXICON s8/48
!! __@LEXNAME@__
  s8  ;
  s48 ;
LEXICON s9/30
!! __@LEXNAME@__
  s9  ;
  s30 ;





!! !!Intermediate lexicon groups
! ===========================

LEXICON standard_ir
!! __@LEXNAME@__
  inf     ;
  prt_d   ;
  ir_verb ;

LEXICON standard_ir_t
!! __@LEXNAME@__
   inf                  ;
   prt_t                ; !XXX skilti
   ir_verb_t            ;

!LEXICON standard_j_ir_t
!  prt_t                ; !XXX skilti
!  standard_j_ir_nopret ;

! possibly also (no, handled by s1/2
!LEXICON standard_j_ir_td
!  prt_t                ;
!  prt_d                ;
!  standard_j_ir_nopret ;


LEXICON standard_j_ir !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ the prt_d
  standard_j_ir_nopret ;
  prt_d                ;

LEXICON standard_j_ir_nopret
!! __@LEXNAME@__
    jinf       ;
    pres_ir_sg ;
 :j pres_pl    ;
    imp_prsptc ;
    sup        ;

LEXICON ir_verb
!! __@LEXNAME@__
  pres_ir    ;
  imp_prsptc ;
  sup        ;
