src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
eftirhyggja:eftir# HYGGJA ;
hyggja: HYGGJA ;
baksast:baks s74 ;
klikast:klik s74 ;
giftast:gift s77 ;
forstilla:for#still s9/30 ;
skiftast:skift s77 ;
høggast:høgg FYRIB ;
munnhøggast:munn#høgg FYRIB ;
grovhøggast:grov#høgg FYRIB ;
dáma:dám s30/26_1 ;
renna:renn s8/48 ;
brenna:brenn s8/48 ;
vaksa: VAKSA ;
bráðvaksa:bráð# VAKSA ;
skundvaksa:skund# VAKSA ;
veksa:v VEKSA ;
krubbast:krubb s74 ;
brugdast:brugd s74 ;
grovskeldast:grovskeld s74 ;
aveldast:av#eld s77 ;
eldast:eld s77 ;
grindast:grind s74 ;
forsyndast:forsynd s74 ;
vavdast:vavd s74 ;
avdagast:avdag s74 ;
dólgast:dólg s74 ;
nøgast:nøg s75 ;
bilgjast:bilgj FYRIB ;
slekjast:slek s81 ;
smoykjast:smoyk s81 ;
smeikjast:smeik s81 ;
horfikjast:horfik s81 ;
mylkjast:mylk s81 ;
líkjast:lík s81 ;
samlíkjast:sam#lík s81 ;
slíkjast:slík s81 ;
ljóðlíkjast:ljóð#lík s81 ;
rúmøkjast:rúmøkj s74 ; ! XXX check
kjakast:kjak s74 ;
trekast:trek s74 ;
hálvbrokkast:hálvbrokk s74 ;
mislukkast:mislukk s74 ;
dankast:dank s74 ;
pjankast:pjank s74 ;
borðkokast:borðkok s74 ;
skjørkast:skjørk s74 ;
naskast:nask s74 ;
treiskast:treisk s74 ;
illbrýnskast:illbrýnsk s74 ;
vitkast:vitk s74 ;
trætkast:trætk s74 ;
balast:bal s75 ;
skridlast:skridl s74 ;
riglast:rigl s74 ;
finglast:fingl s74 ;
unglast:ungl s74 ;
bonsklast:bonskl s74 ;
sjúklast:sjúkl s74 ;
pallast:pall s74 ;
snillast:snill s74 ;
hagvillast:hag#vill s83 ;
fyllast:fyll s83 ;
villast:vill s83 ;
sinnast:sinn s83 ;
ullast:ull s74 ;
borðfyllast:borð#fyll s83 ;
viplast:vipl s74 ;
fangslast:fangsl s74 ;
veitslast:veitsl s74 ;
getlast:getl s74 ;
fritlast:fritl s74 ;
kventlast:kventl s74 ;
drontlast:drontl s74 ;
ylast:yl s74 ;
býlast:býl s74 ;
fýlast:fýl s82 ;
eimast:eim s74 ;
grammast:gramm s74 ;
granast:gran s74 ;
svidnast:svidn s74 ;
eydnast:eydn s74 ;
avdegnast:avdegn s74 ;
einast:ein s82 ;
marknast:markn s74 ;
ulnast:uln s74 ;
viðkennast:við#kenn s83 ;
minnast:minn s83 ;
illminnast:ill#minn s83 ;
ørminnast:ør#minn s83 ;
misminnast:mis#minn s83 ;
samsinnast:sam#sinn s83 ;
hepnast:hepn s74 ;
garnast:garn s74 ;
girnast:girn s74 ;
hugsnast:hugsn s74 ;
trivnast:trivn s74 ;
svøvnast:svøvn s74 ;
fortapast:fortap s82 ;
munnsleipast:munnsleip s74 ;
klumpast:klump s74 ;
farast:far s78 ;
fyrifarast:fyri#far s78 ;
litifarast:liti#far s78 ;
umfarast:um#far s78 ;
forfarast:for#far s78 ;
viðurfarast:viður#far s78 ;
misfarast:mis#far s78 ;
litfarast:lit#far s78 ;
viðfarast:við#far s78 ;
sjófarast:sjó#far s78 ;
skjarast:skjar s75 ;
sældrast:sældr s74 ;
irskrast:irskr s74 ;
himprast:himpr s74 ;
slentrast:slentr s74 ;
kløtrast:kløtr s74 ;
mírast:mír s75 ;
smírast:smír s75 ;
slyðrast:slyðr s74 ;
ovnørast:ovnør s75 ;
nørast:nør s75 ;
rafsast:rafs s74 ;
heksast:heks s74 ;
kvapsast:kvaps s74 ;
vásast:vás s74 ;
litskiftast:lit#skift s77 ;
orðskiftast:orð#skift s77 ;
svitast:svit s74 ;
antast:ant s74 ;
glentast:glent s74 ;
búfestast:bú#fest s77 ;
dystast:dyst s74 ;
bakfettast:bak#fett s83 ;
tennast:tenn s83 ;
litbroytast:lit#broyt s82 ;
broytast:broyt s82 ;
meitast:meit s82 ;
illbítast:ill#bít s80 ;
bítast:bít s80 ;
skjótast:sk s79 ;
akslaskjótast:aksla#sk s79 ;
mjadnaskjótast:mjadna#sk s79 ;
aksaskjótast:aksa#sk s79 ;
buktaskjótast:bukta#sk s79 ;
hamskjótast:ham#sk s79 ;
lykkjuskjótast:lykkju#sk s79 ;
stavskjótast:stav#sk s79 ;
kálvskjótast:kálv#sk s79 ;
knæskjótast:knæ#sk s79 ;
orðgýtast:orð#gýt s82 ;
munnkýtast:munn#kýt s82 ;
kappkýtast:kapp#kýt s82 ;
orðkýtast:orð#kýt s82 ;
avlógvast:avlógv s74 ;
ivast:iv s74 ;
narvast:narv s74 ;
trívast:trív s80 ;
illtrívast:ill#trív s80 ;
vantrívast:van#trív s80 ;
mistrívast:mis#trív s80 ;
gleðast:gleð s76 ;
samgleðast:sam#gleð s76 ;
gøðast:gøð s76 ;
steðast:steð s74 ;
samráðast:sam#ráð s76 ;
ráðast:ráð s76 ;
avklæðast:av#klæð s76 ;
klæðast:klæð s76 ;
íklæðast:í#klæð s76 ;
ræðast:ræð s76 ;
deyðaræðast:deyða#ræð s76 ;
híðast:híð s76 ;
kappstríðast:kapp#stríð s76 ;
stríðast:stríð s76 ;
tvíljóðast:tvíljóð s74 ;
fjeppast:fjepp s83 ;
ferðast:ferð s74 ;
behøvast:behøv s75 ;
kempast:kemp s74 ;
bylgjast:bylgj sxrefl ;
skelloypast:skel#loyp LOYPAST ;
loypast:loyp LOYPAST ;
